Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-2,102
Satellites; prohibited acts; penalty.

(1) Any person who, without the authority of the satellite operator, intentionally or maliciously interferes with the authorized operation of a communications or weather satellite or obstructs or hinders any satellite transmission is guilty of a Class IV felony.

(2) This section shall not prohibit any lawfully authorized investigative, protective, or intelligence activity of a law enforcement agency of the United States or this state.

Laws 1988, LB 899, § 13;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-707.07;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 164.